Vermont, session 2025-2026, H756.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to empower landlords to address drug and human
trafficking in rental properties, ensure safe housing environments, enhance
penalties for human trafficking, and prioritize community safety and recovery.
Sec. 2. 9 V.S.A. § 4457 is amended to read:
§ 4457. LANDLORD OBLIGATIONS; HABITABILITY
* * *
(d) Termination of tenancy. A landlord shall notify any relevant housing
authority with 48 hours after providing notice of termination of a residential
rental agreement under section 4467 of this title for a tenant receiving housing
assistance.
(e) Criminal activity. A landlord shall notify law enforcement of suspected
human trafficking, as that term is defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2651, as soon as
VT LEG #385858 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.756
2026 Page 3 of 8
practicable after the occurrence of the suspected human trafficking within a
dwelling unit owned or managed by the landlord.
Sec. 3. 9 V.S.A. § 4467 is amended to read:
§ 4467. TERMINATION OF TENANCY; NOTICE
* * *
(b) Termination for breach of rental agreement.
(1) The landlord may terminate a tenancy for failure of the a tenant,
household member, or guest to comply with a material term of the rental
agreement or with obligations imposed under this chapter by actual notice
given to the tenant at least 30 days prior to the termination date specified in the
notice.
(2) When termination is based on criminal activity, illegal drug activity,
human trafficking, or acts of violence, any of which threaten the health or
safety of other residents, the landlord may terminate the tenancy by providing
actual notice to the tenant of the date on which the tenancy will terminate,
which shall be at least 14 seven days from the date of the actual notice.
* * *
Sec. 4. 12 V.S.A. § 4852 is amended to read:
§ 4852. MODE OF PROCESS; DECLARATION; TRIAL BY JURY
(a) The process may issue as a summons or writ of attachment, requiring
the defendant to appear and answer to the complaint of the plaintiff, which
VT LEG #385858 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.756
2026 Page 4 of 8
shall state that the defendant is in the possession of the lands or tenements in
question (describing them), which the tenant holds unlawfully and against the
right of the plaintiff. A copy of the rental agreement, if any, and any notice to
terminate the defendant’s tenancy shall be attached to the complaint. Either
party shall have the right to a trial by jury.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule, the defendant shall
file an answer within five business days after receiving the complaint. The
computation of the five-day period shall include the day on which the
defendant receives the complaint.
(c) When the court sets the date for the initial hearing on the complaint,
dates shall also be set for consideration of lease violations and for payment of
rent into court if a motion for such payment was filed pursuant to section
4853a, 4853b, or 4853c of this title.
Sec. 5. 12 V.S.A. § 4853c is added to read:
§ 4853c. SUSPECTED CRIMINAL ACTIVITY; EXPEDITED HEARING
(a)(1) In an action for ejectment, the landlord, the landlord’s agent, or the
tenant may file a motion for a judgment that the plaintiff is entitled to
immediate possession of the premises on the grounds that the termination of
the rental agreement is based on criminal activity, illegal drug activity, human
trafficking, or acts of violence, any of which threaten the health or safety of
other residents under 9 V.S.A. § 4467(b).
VT LEG #385858 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.756
2026 Page 5 of 8
(2) The motion may be filed and served with the complaint or at any
time after the complaint has been filed. The motion shall be accompanied by
an affidavit setting forth particular facts in support of the motion and a copy of
the lease agreement.
(b) A hearing on the motion shall be held within 10 days after the motion is
filed.
(c) At any time before the hearing, the defendant may oppose the motion
pursuant to Rule 7(b)(6) of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure by filing an
affidavit, a signed written statement, or a memorandum in opposition to the
motion. The affidavit, signed written statement, or memorandum shall set
forth particular facts to show that a genuine dispute of fact exists in relation to
the motion.
(d) If the defendant fails to appear for the hearing, or to file an affidavit,
signed written statement, or memorandum in opposition to the plaintiff’s
motion, or has failed to file an answer in the time provided pursuant to section
4852 of this title, the plaintiff shall be entitled to judgment by default for
immediate possession of the premises.
(e) If the court issues judgment in favor of the plaintiff pursuant to
subsection (d) of this section, the court shall, on the date judgment is entered,
issue a writ of possession directing the sheriff of the county in which the
property or a portion thereof is located to serve the writ upon the defendant
VT LEG #385858 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.756
2026 Page 6 of 8
and, not sooner than five days after the writ is served, to put the plaintiff into
possession.
Sec. 6. 13 V.S.A. § 2659 is amended to read:
§ 2659. KNOWINGLY PERMITTING HUMAN TRAFFICKING IN A
DWELLING
(a) No person shall knowingly permit a dwelling, building, or structure
owned by or under the control of the person to be used for the purpose of
human trafficking or aggravated human trafficking in violation of section 2652
or 2653 of this title.
(b) A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned not more than
two 10 years or fined not more than $15,000.00 $500,000.00, or both.
(c) It shall not be a violation of this section if the person who owns or
controls the dwelling, building, or structure takes action to address the
unlawful activity.
Sec. 7. 18 V.S.A. § 4252 is amended to read:
§ 4252. KNOWINGLY PERMITTING SALE OF REGULATED DRUGS IN
A DWELLING OR WITHIN 500 FEET OF A DWELLING
(a)(1) No person shall knowingly permit a dwelling, building, or structure
owned by or under the control of the person to be used for the purpose of
illegally selling a regulated drug.
VT LEG #385858 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.756
2026 Page 7 of 8
(2) No person shall knowingly and unlawfully dispense or sell a
regulated drug to any person within 500 feet of a residential dwelling unit.
(b) [Repealed.]
(c) A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned not more than
two 10 years or fined not more than $15,000.00 $500,000.00, or both.
(d) It shall not be a violation of this section if the person who owns or
controls the dwelling, building, or structure takes action to address the
unlawful activity.
Sec. 8. 9 V.S.A. § 4454a is added to read:
§ 4454a. LANDLORD ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
(a)(1) The Department of Housing and Community Development, in
collaboration with the Department of Public Safety and the Department of
Health, shall develop:
(A) guidelines for landlord screening processes to help prevent
human trafficking while protecting prospective tenant privacy;
(B) training for landlords on identifying and reporting human
trafficking activity; and
(C) coordination with law enforcement for swift eviction and
prosecution of human trafficking offenders.
(2) Guidelines and trainings developed under this subsection shall be
reviewed annually and updated as appropriate.
VT LEG #385858 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.756
2026 Page 8 of 8
(b)(1) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall
create and implement a landlord assistance program to reimburse landlords for
legal costs related to termination and ejectment of tenants due to human
trafficking violations.
(2) Reimbursement under this subsection shall be limited to $2,500.00
per complaint.
Sec. 9. GUIDELINES
The Department of Housing and Community Development shall develop
initial guidelines and trainings required by 9 V.S.A. § 4454a on or before
January 1, 2027.
Sec. 10. APPROPRIATION
The sum of $2,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Housing and Community Development in fiscal year 2027 for
the purpose of funding the landlord assistance program created by 9 V.S.A.
§ 4454a.
Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385858 v.1